bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за караоке системи: Калъфи за караоке; Чипове за караоке; Микрофони за караоке; Дистанционни управления за караоке
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 노래방 기계 부대용품: 노래방 휴대용 케이스; 노래방 칩; 노래방 마이크; 노래방 리모컨
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Karaoke Sistem Aksesuarları: Karaoke Taşıma Çantaları; Karaoke Çipleri; Karaoke Mikrofonları; Karaoke Uzaktan Kumandaları
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo ku karaoke systému: Puzdrá na prenos karaoke systémov; Karaoke čipy; Karaoke mikrofóny; Karaoke diaľkové ovládače
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires de karaoké: Étuis de transport pour karaoké; Cartouches pour karaoké; Microphones de karaoké; Télécommandes de karaoké
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 卡拉 OK 系統配件: 卡啦 OK 攜帶箱; 卡拉 OK 音源晶片; 卡拉 OK 麥克風; 卡拉 OK 遙控器
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para sistemas de karaokê: Estojos para transporte de karaokê; Fichas de karaokê; Microfones para karaokê; Controles remotos para karaokê
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > カラオケ機器アクセサリー: カラオケ持ち運び用ケース; カラオケチップ; カラオケマイク; カラオケリモコン
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za karaoke: Torbe za pribor za karaoke; Karaoke čipovi; Karaoke mikrofoni; Daljinski upravljači za karaoke
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Karaoke System Accessories: Karaoke Carrying Cases; Karaoke Chips; Karaoke Microphones; Karaoke Remote Controls
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de sistemas de karaoke: Estojos para transporte de karaoke; Cartuchos de Karaoke; Microfones para karaoke; Comandos para karaoke
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์ระบบคาราโอเกะ: กระเป๋าคาราโอเกะแบบพกพา; ชิปคาราโอเกะ; ไมโครโฟนคาราโอเกะ; รีโมทควบคุมคาราโอเกะ
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Karaokesystem – tilbehør: Bæretasker til karaoke; Karaoke-chips; Karaoke-mikrofoner; Karaoke-fjernbetjeninger
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Karaokerendszer-kiegészítők: Karaokehordozó-tokok; Karaoke chipek; Karaoke-mikrofonok; Karaoke-távirányítók
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Zubehör für Karaoke-Systeme: Transporttaschen für Karaoke; Karaoke-Speicherchips; Karaoke-Mikrofone; Karaoke-Fernbedienungen
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Tilbehør til karaokesystemer: Bærevesker for karaoke; Karaokechiper; Karaokemikrofoner; Karaokefjernkontroller
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Systémy karaoke – příslušenství: Přepravní kufry na karaoke; Čipy na karaoke; Karaoke mikrofony; Dálková ovládání pro karaoke
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios del sistema de karaoke: Estuches de transporte para karaoke; Chips de canciones; Micrófonos de karaoke; Controles remotos de karaoke
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii pentru sistem karaoke: Huse de transport karaoke; Cipuri Karaoke; Microfoane pentru karaoke; Telecomenzi pentru karaoke
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > Karaokejärjestelmän lisätarvikkeet: Karaokekantokotelot; Karaokesirut; Karaokemikrofoni; Karaokekaukosäädin
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для караоке-систем: Кейсы для караоке-систем; Чипы с песнями для караоке; Микрофоны для караоке; Пульты управления для караоке
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ συστήματος καραόκε: Θήκες μεταφοράς καραόκε; Τσιπ καραόκε; Μικρόφωνα καραόκε; Τηλεχειριστήρια καραόκε
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori sistema karaoke: Custodie per il trasporto del karaoke; Chip karaoke; Microfoni karaoke; Telecomandi karaoke
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Karaokės sistemų priedai: Karaokės nešiojimo dėklai; Karaokės lustai; Karaoke mikrofonai; Karaoke nuotoliniai valdikliai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện hệ thống karaoke: Hộp đựng bộ dàn karaoke; Chip xử lí âm thanh đầu karaoke; Microphone karaoke; Điều khiển từ xa karaoke
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za karaoke sisteme: Torbice za karaoke; Elektronske komponente za karaoke; Karaoke mikrofoni; Daljinski upravljalniki za karaoke
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Tillbehör till karaokesystem: Karaoke-bärväskor; Musikchip för karaoke; Karaokemikrofoner; Fjärrkontroller till karaoke
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 卡拉OK系统配件: 卡拉 OK 便携包; 卡拉OK芯片; 卡拉 OK 麦克风; 卡拉 OK 遥控器
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do systemów karaoke: Futerały do systemów karaoke; Kartridże do karaoke; Mikrofony karaoke; Piloty karaoke
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Accessoires voor karaokesystemen: Draagdozen voor karaoke; Chips voor karaoke; Karaoke microfoons; Karaoke afstandsbedieningen